csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: mawadisik
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishishin
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: mawadish
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [mawadishishinaan,mawadishishinaang]
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaadaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mawadish+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaadaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishisiimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishisiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigodogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigodog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishisiim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishisiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigoog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishisiimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishisiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigobaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoom
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoom
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinooninaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisininaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigodogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigodog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinoon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigoog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinooninaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisininaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigobaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiidogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiidogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasiidogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaasiidogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaawaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasii'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasii'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasii'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaasiiwa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaawaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaawa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiibane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiibane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaasiibane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaasiibane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimawadisimaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimawadisimaabane'
